Hawaii statutes.
[§98-11] Relation to Electronic Signatures
in Global and National Commerce Act. This chapter modifies, limits, and
supersedes the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15
U.S.C. section 7001 et seq., but does not modify, limit, or supersede section
101(c) of that Act, 15 U.S.C. section 7001(c), or authorize electronic delivery
of any of the notices described in section 103(b) of that Act, 15 U.S.C. section
7003(b). [L 2013, c 11, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next